Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,136
Tickets; sale; commissioner may supervise.

The State Athletic Commissioner may have control and supervision of the sale of tickets and the issuing of complimentary tickets. He or she may be represented to supervise and check the counting of receipts, to enforce any and all rules and regulations of the commissioner, and to see that the provisions of sections 81-8,128 to 81-8,142.01, the rules and regulations of the commissioner, and the articles of agreement are carried out and complied with.

Laws 1957, c. 382, § 9, p. 1329;

Laws 1980, LB 849, § 10.